District of Columbia statutes.
29-1202.02

Amendment or restatement of certificate of trust; statement of correction.

(a)

A certificate of trust may be amended or restated at any time.

(b)

To amend its certificate of trust, a statutory trust shall deliver to the Mayor for filing an amendment stating the:

(1)

Name of the trust;

(2)

Date of filing of its initial certificate; and

(3)

Changes to the certificate as most recently amended or restated.

(c)

To restate its certificate of trust, a statutory trust must deliver to the Mayor for filing a restatement designated as such in its heading.

(d)

A trustee that knows or has reason to know that information in a filed certificate of trust was inaccurate when the certificate was filed or has become inaccurate due to changed circumstances shall promptly:

(1)

Cause the certificate to be amended; or

(2)

If appropriate, deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of change under § 29-104.07 or a statement of correction under § 29-102.05.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(3)(B), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-1202.05 and § 29-1209.01.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 202 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.